Utah statutes.
13-12-7.   District court's jurisdiction over violations -- Equitable relief
-- Attorney's fees and costs -- Action for failure to renew -- Damages
limited.
The district courts for the district wherein the dealer resides or wherein the
dealership was to be established shall have jurisdiction over any action
involving a violation of this act. In addition to such relief as may be
available at common law, the courts may grant such equitable relief, both
interim and final, as may be necessary to remedy those violations including,
but not limited to, declaratory judgments, injunctive relief, and punitive
damages as well as actual damages. The prevailing party may, in the court's
sole discretion, be awarded attorney's fees and expert witness fees in
addition to such other relief as the court may deem equitable. In any action
for failure to renew an agreement, damages shall be limited to actual damages,
including the value of the dealer's equity in the dealership, together with
reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
